tests/хӗв.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах хӗв":
    хӗв<n><nom> :  хӗв 
    хӗв<n><gen> :  хӗвӗн 
    хӗв<n><dat> :  хӗве 
    хӗв<n><loc> :  хӗвре 
    хӗв<n><abl> :  хӗврен 
    хӗв<n><ins> :  хӗвпе 
    хӗв<n><abe> :  хӗвсӗр 
    хӗв<n><ben> :  хӗвшӗн
    хӗв<n><px1sg><nom> :  хӗвӗм 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><gen> :  хӗвӗмӗн 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><dat> :  хӗвӗме 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><loc> :  хӗвӗмре 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><abl> :  хӗвӗмрен 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><ins> :  хӗвӗмпе 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><abe> :  хӗвӗмсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><ben> :  хӗвӗмшӗн
    хӗв<n><px2sg><nom> :  хӗвӳ 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><gen> :  хӗвӳн 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><dat> :  хӗвне
    хӗв<n><px2sg><loc> :  хӗвӳнте 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><abl> :  хӗвӳнтен 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><ins> :  хӗвӳпе 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><abe> :  хӗвӳсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><ben> :  хӗвӳшӗн
    хӗв<n><px3sp><nom> :  хӗвӗ 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><gen> :  хӗвӗн 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><dat> :  хӗвне 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><loc> :  хӗвӗнче 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><abl> :  хӗвӗнчен 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><ins> :  хӗвӗпе 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><abe> :  хӗвӗсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><ben> :  хӗвӗшӗн
    хӗв<n><px1pl><nom> :  хӗвӗмӗр 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><gen> :  хӗвӗмӗрӗн 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><dat> :  хӗвӗмӗре 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><loc> :  хӗвӗмӗрте 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><abl> :  хӗвӗмӗртен 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><ins> :  хӗвӗмӗрпе 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><abe> :  хӗвӗмӗрсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><ben> :  хӗвӗмӗршӗн
    хӗв<n><px2pl><nom> :  хӗвӗр 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><gen> :  хӗвӗрӗн 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><dat> :  хӗвӗре 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><loc> :  хӗвӗрте 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><abl> :  хӗвӗртен 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><ins> :  хӗвӗрпе 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><abe> :  хӗвӗрсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><ben> :  хӗвӗршӗн
    хӗв<n><pl><nom> :  хӗвсем 
    хӗв<n><pl><gen> :  хӗвсен 
    хӗв<n><pl><dat> :  хӗвсене 
    хӗв<n><pl><loc> :  хӗвсенче 
    хӗв<n><pl><abl> :  хӗвсенчен 
    хӗв<n><pl><ins> :  хӗвсемпе 
    хӗв<n><pl><abe> :  хӗвсемсӗр 
    хӗв<n><pl><ben> :  хӗвсемшӗн
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  хӗвӗмсем 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  хӗвӗмсен 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  хӗвӗмсене 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  хӗвӗмсенче 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  хӗвӗмсенчен 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  хӗвӗмсемпе 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  хӗвӗмсемсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  хӗвӗмсемшӗн
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  хӗвӳсем 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  хӗвӳсен 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  хӗвӳсене 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  хӗвӳсенче 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  хӗвӳсенчен 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  хӗвӳсемпе 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  хӗвӳсемсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  хӗвӳсемшӗн
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  хӗвӗсем 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  хӗвӗсен 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  хӗвӗсене 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  хӗвӗсенче 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  хӗвӗсенчен 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  хӗвӗсемпе 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  хӗвӗсемсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  хӗвӗсемшӗн
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  хӗвӗмӗрсем 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  хӗвӗмӗрсен 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  хӗвӗмӗрсене 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  хӗвӗмӗрсенче 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  хӗвӗмӗрсенчен 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  хӗвӗмӗрсемпе 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  хӗвӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  хӗвӗмӗрсемшӗн
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  хӗвӗрсем 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  хӗвӗрсен 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  хӗвӗрсене 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  хӗвӗрсенче 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  хӗвӗрсенчен 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  хӗвӗрсемпе 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  хӗвӗрсемсӗр 
    хӗв<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  хӗвӗрсемшӗн
